Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
General Provisions

§ 71-3-1.
Citation; purpose; construction.

This chapter shall be known and cited as “Workers’ Compensation Law,” and shall be administered by the Workers’ Compensation Commission, hereinafter referred to as the “commission,” cooperating with other state and federal authorities for the prevention of injuries and occupational diseases to workers and, in event of injury or occupational disease, their rehabilitation or restoration to health and vocational opportunity; and this chapter shall be fairly and impartially construed and applied according to the law and the evidence in the record, and, notwithstanding any common law or case law to the contrary, this chapter shall not be presumed to favor one party over another and shall not be liberally construed in order to fulfill any beneficent purposes.

Wherever used in this chapter, or in any other statute or rule or regulation affecting the former Workmen’s Compensation Law and any of its functions or duties:

The words “workmen’s compensation” shall mean “workers’ compensation”; and

The word “commission” shall mean the Workers’ Compensation Commission.

The primary purposes of the Workers’ Compensation Law are to pay timely temporary and permanent disability benefits to every worker who legitimately suffers a work-related injury or occupational disease arising out of and in the course of his employment, to pay reasonable and necessary medical expenses resulting from the work-related injury or occupational disease, and to encourage the return to work of the worker.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 275; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 408; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 522, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 71-3-3.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions which follow govern the construction and meaning of the terms used in this chapter:

“Person” includes an individual, firm, voluntary association or a corporation.

“Injury” means accidental injury or accidental death arising out of and in the course of employment without regard to fault which results from an untoward event or events, if contributed to or aggravated or accelerated by the employment in a significant manner. Untoward event includes events causing unexpected results. An untoward event or events shall not be presumed to have arisen out of and in the course of employment, except in the case of an employee found dead in the course of employment. This definition includes injuries to artificial members, and also includes an injury caused by the willful act of a third person directed against an employee because of his employment while so employed and working on the job, and disability or death due to exposure to ionizing radiation from any process in employment involving the use of or direct contact with radium or radioactive substances with the use of or direct exposure to roentgen (X-rays) or ionizing radiation. In radiation cases only, the date of disablement shall be treated as the date of the accident. Occupational diseases, or the aggravation thereof, are excluded from the term “injury,” provided that, except as otherwise specified, all provisions of this chapter apply equally to occupational diseases as well as injury.

“Death,” when mentioned as a basis for the right to compensation, means only death resulting from such an injury.

“Employee” means any person, including a minor whether lawfully or unlawfully employed, in the service of an employer under any contract of hire or apprenticeship, written or oral, express or implied, provided that there shall be excluded therefrom all independent contractors and especially any individual performing service in, and at the time of, the sale of newspapers or magazines to ultimate consumers under an arrangement under which the newspapers or magazines are to be sold by the individual at a fixed price, the individual’s compensation being based on the retention of the excess of such price over the amount at which the newspapers or magazines are charged to the individual, whether or not the individual is guaranteed a minimum amount of compensation for such service or is entitled to be credited with the unsold newspapers or magazines returned. A student of an educational institution who, as a part of such educational institution’s curriculum, is receiving practical training at any facility, who is under the active and direct supervision of the personnel of the facility and/or an instructor of the educational institution, and who is not receiving wages as a consequence of participation in such practical training shall not be considered an employee of such facility on account of participation in such practical training.

“Employer,” except when otherwise expressly stated, includes a person, partnership, association, corporation and the legal representatives of a deceased employer, or the receiver or trustee of a person, partnership, association or corporation.

“Carrier” means any person authorized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter to insure under this chapter and includes self-insurers.

“Self-insurer” is an employer who has been authorized under the provisions of this chapter to carry his own liability on his covered employees without insuring in a stock or mutual carrier.

“Commission” means the Workers’ Compensation Commission.

“Disability” means incapacity because of injury to earn the wages which the employee was receiving at the time of injury in the same or other employment, which incapacity and the extent thereof must be supported by medical findings.

“Compensation” means the money allowance payable to an injured worker or his dependents as provided in this chapter, and includes funeral benefits provided therein.

“Wages” includes the money rate at which the service rendered is recompensed under the contract of hiring in force at the time of injury, and also the reasonable value of board, rent, housing, lodging or similar advantage received from the employer and gratuities received in the course of employment from others than the employer. The term “wages” shall not include practical training received by students of an educational institution as a part of such educational institution’s curriculum.

“Child” shall include a posthumous child, a child legally adopted prior to the injury of the employee, a child in relation to whom the deceased employee stood in the place of a parent for at least one (1) year prior to the time of injury and a stepchild or acknowledged illegitimate child dependent upon the deceased, but does not include married children unless wholly dependent on him. “Grandchild” means a child as above defined of a child as above defined. “Brother” and “sister” include stepbrothers and stepsisters, half brothers and half sisters, and brothers and sisters by adoption, but does not include married brothers nor married sisters unless wholly dependent on the employee. “Child,” “grandchild,” “brother” and “sister” include only persons who are under eighteen (l8) years of age, and also persons who, though eighteen (l8) years of age or over, are wholly dependent upon the deceased employee and incapable of self-support by reason of mental or physical disability, and also a child eighteen (18) years of age or older, until his twenty-third birthday, who is dependent upon the deceased and is pursuing a full-time education.

“Parent” includes stepparents and parents by adoption, parents-in-law or any person who for more than three (3) years prior to the death of the deceased employee stood in the place of a parent to him, or her, if dependent on the injured employee.

The term “surviving spouse” includes the decedent’s legal wife or husband, living with him or her or dependent for support upon him or her at the time of death or living apart for justifiable cause or by reason of desertion at such time, provided, however, such separation had not existed for more than three (3) years without an award for separate maintenance or alimony or the filing of a suit for separate maintenance or alimony in the proper court in this state. The term “surviving spouse” shall likewise include one not a legal wife or husband but who had entered into a ceremonial marriage with the decedent at least one (1) year prior to death and who, on the date of the decedent’s death, stood in the relationship of a wife or husband, provided there was no living legal spouse who had protected her or his rights for support by affirmative action as hereinabove required. The term “surviving spouse” as contemplated in this chapter shall not apply to any person who has, since his or her separation from decedent, entered into a ceremonial marriage or lived in open adultery with another.

The term “adoption” or “adopted” means legal adoption prior to the time of the injury.

The singular includes the plural and the masculine includes the feminine and neuter.

It is expressly provided, agreed and understood in determining beneficiaries under this section that a surviving spouse suffering a mental or physical handicap and children under the age of eighteen (18) years are presumed to be dependent.

“Independent contractor” means any individual, firm or corporation who contracts to do a piece of work according to his own methods without being subject to the control of his employer except as to the results of the work, and who has the right to employ and direct the outcome of the workers independent of the employer and free from any superior authority in the employer to say how the specified work shall be done or what the laborers shall do as the work progresses, one who undertakes to produce a given result without being in any way controlled as to the methods by which he attains the result.

“Average weekly wage for the state” means an amount determined by the commission as of October 1 of each year based upon wage and employment statistics reported to the commission by the Mississippi Employment Security Commission. Such amount shall be based upon data for the preceding twelve-month period and shall be effective from and after January 1 of the following year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-02; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 344; Laws, 1960, ch. 276; Laws, 1962, ch. 473; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 475, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 446, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 495, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 71-3-5.
Application.

The following shall constitute employers subject to the provisions of this chapter:

Every person, firm and private corporation, including any public service corporation but excluding, however, all nonprofit charitable, fraternal, cultural, or religious corporations or associations, that have in service five (5) or more workmen or operatives regularly in the same business or in or about the same establishment under any contract of hire, express or implied.

Any state agency, state institution, state department, or subdivision thereof, including counties, municipalities and school districts, or the singular thereof, not heretofore included under the Workers’ Compensation Law, may elect, by proper action of its officers or department head, to come within its provisions and, in such case, shall notify the commission of such action by filing notice of compensation insurance with the commission. Payment for compensation insurance policies so taken may be made from any appropriation or funds available to such agency, department or subdivision thereof, or from the general fund of any county or municipality.

From and after July 1, 1990, all offices, departments, agencies, bureaus, commissions, boards, institutions, hospitals, colleges, universities, airport authorities or other instrumentalities of the “state” as such term is defined in Section 11-46-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall come under the provisions of the Workers’ Compensation Law. Payment for compensation insurance policies so taken may be made from any appropriation or funds available to such office, department, agency, bureau, commission, board, institution, hospital, college, university, airport authority or other instrumentality of the state.

From and after October 1, 1990, counties and municipalities shall come under the provisions of the Workers’ Compensation Law. Payment for compensation insurance policies so taken may be made from any funds available to such counties and municipalities.

From and after October 1, 1993, all “political subdivisions,” as such term is defined in Section 11-46-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, except counties and municipalities shall come under the provisions of the Workers’ Compensation Law. Payment for compensation insurance policies so taken may be made from any funds available to such political subdivisions.

From and after July 1, 1988, the “state” as such term is defined in Section 11-46-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, may elect to become a self-insurer under the provisions elsewhere set out by law, by notifying the commission of its intent to become a self-insurer. The cost of being such a self-insurer, as provided otherwise by law, may be paid from funds available to the offices, departments, agencies, bureaus, commissions, boards, institutions, hospitals, colleges, universities, airport authorities or other instrumentalities of the state.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission, the Department of Public Safety and the Mississippi Industries for the Blind may elect to become self-insurers under the provisions elsewhere set out by law by notifying the commission of their intention of becoming such a self-insurer. The cost of being such a self-insurer, as provided elsewhere by law, may be paid from funds available to the Mississippi Transportation Commission, the Department of Public Safety or the Mississippi Industries for the Blind.

The Mississippi State Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives may elect to become self-insurers under provisions elsewhere set out by law by notifying the commission of their intention of becoming such self-insurers. The cost of being such self-insurers, as provided elsewhere by law, may be paid from funds available to the Mississippi State Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives. The Mississippi State Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives are authorized and empowered to provide workers’ compensation benefits for employees after January 1, 1970.

Any municipality of the State of Mississippi having forty thousand (40,000) population or more desiring to do so may elect to become a self-insurer under provisions elsewhere set out by law by notifying the commission of its intention of becoming such an insurer. The cost of being such a self-insurer, as provided elsewhere by law, may be provided from any funds available to such municipality.

The commission may, under such rules and regulations as it prescribes, permit two (2) or more “political subdivisions,” as such term is defined in Section 11-46-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, to pool their liabilities to participate in a group workers’ compensation self-insurance program. The governing authorities of any political subdivision may authorize the organization and operation of, or the participation in such a group self-insurance program with other political subdivisions, provided such program is approved by the commission. The cost of participating in a group self-insurance program may be provided from any funds available to a political subdivision.

Domestic servants, farmers and farm labor are not included under the provisions of this chapter, but this exemption does not apply to the processing of agricultural products when carried on commercially. Any purchaser of timber products shall not be liable for workers’ compensation for any person who harvests and delivers timber to such purchaser if such purchaser is not liable for unemployment tax on the person harvesting and delivering the timber as provided by United States Code Annotated, Title 26, Section 3306, as amended. Provided, however, nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt an employer who would otherwise be covered under this section from providing workers’ compensation coverage on those employees for whom he is liable for unemployment tax.

Employers exempted by this section may assume, with respect to any employee or classification of employees, the liability for compensation imposed upon employers by this chapter with respect to employees within the coverage of this chapter. The purchase and acceptance by such employer of valid workers’ compensation insurance applicable to such employee or classification of employees shall constitute, as to such employer, an assumption by him of such liability under this chapter without any further act on his part notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, but only with respect to such employee or such classification of employees as are within the coverage of the state fund. Such assumption of liability shall take effect and continue from the effective date of such workers’ compensation insurance and as long only as such coverage shall remain in force, in which case the employer shall be subject with respect to such employee or classification of employees to no other liability than the compensation as provided for in this chapter.

An owner/operator, and his drivers, must provide a certificate of insurance of workers’ compensation coverage to the motor carrier or proof of coverage under a self-insured plan or an occupational accident policy. Any such occupational accident policy shall provide a minimum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) of coverage. Should the owner/operator fail to provide written proof of coverage to the motor carrier, then the owner/operator, and his drivers, shall be covered under the motor carrier’s workers’ compensation insurance program and the motor carrier is authorized to collect payment of the premium from the owner/operator. In the event that coverage is obtained by the owner/operator under a workers’ compensation policy or through a self-insured or occupational accident policy, then the owner/operator, and his drivers, shall not be entitled to benefits under the motor carrier’s workers’ compensation insurance program unless the owner/operator has elected in writing to be covered under the carrier’s workers’ compensation program or policy or if the owner/operator is covered by the carrier’s plan because he failed to obtain coverage. Coverage under the motor carrier’s workers’ compensation insurance program does not terminate the independent contractor status of the owner/operator under the written contract or lease agreement. Nothing shall prohibit or prevent an owner/operator from having or securing an occupational accident policy in addition to any workers’ compensation coverage authorized by this section. Other than the amendments to this section by Chapter 523, Laws of 2006, the provisions of this section shall not be construed to have any effect on any other provision of law, judicial decision or any applicable common law.

This chapter shall not apply to transportation and maritime employments for which a rule of liability is provided by the laws of the United States.

This chapter shall not be applicable to a mere direct buyer-seller or vendor-vendee relationship where there is no employer-employee relationship as defined by Section 71-3-3, and any insurance carrier is hereby prohibited from charging a premium for any person who is a seller or vendor rather than an employee.

Any employer may elect, by proper and written action of its own governing authority, to be exempt from the provisions of the Workers’ Compensation Law as to its sole proprietor, its partner in a partnership or to its employee who is the owner of fifteen percent (15%) or more of its stock in a corporation, if such sole proprietor, partner or employee also voluntarily agrees thereto in writing. Any sole proprietor, partner or employee owning fifteen percent (15%) or more of the stock of his/her corporate employer who becomes exempt from coverage under the Workers’ Compensation Law shall be excluded from the total number of workers or operatives toward reaching the mandatory coverage threshold level of five (5).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-03; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 438; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 36; Laws, 1964, ch. 443; Laws, 1968, ch. 478, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 454, § 1; ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 416, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 422, § 7; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 13; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 10; Laws, 1988, ch. 479, § 6; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 10; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 45; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 47; Laws, 1992, ch. 577 § 1; Laws, 1992 Special Session, ch. 3, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 523, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).

§ 71-3-7.
Liability for payment of compensation.

Compensation shall be payable for disability or death of an employee from injury or occupational disease arising out of and in the course of employment, without regard to fault as to the cause of the injury or occupational disease. An occupational disease shall be deemed to arise out of and in the course of employment when there is evidence that there is a direct causal connection between the work performed and the occupational disease. In all claims in which no benefits, including disability, death and medical benefits, have been paid, the claimant shall file medical records in support of his claim for benefits when filing a petition to controvert. If the claimant is unable to file the medical records in support of his claim for benefits at the time of filing the petition to controvert because of a limitation of time established by Section 71-3-35 or Section 71-3-53, the claimant shall file medical records in support of his claim within sixty (60) days after filing the petition to controvert.

Where a preexisting physical handicap, disease, or lesion is shown by medical findings to be a material contributing factor in the results following injury, the compensation which, but for this subsection, would be payable shall be reduced by that proportion which such preexisting physical handicap, disease, or lesion contributed to the production of the results following the injury. The preexisting condition does not have to be occupationally disabling for this apportionment to apply.

The following provisions shall apply to subsections (1) and (2) of this section:

Apportionment shall not be applied until the claimant has reached maximum medical recovery.

The employer or carrier does not have the power to determine the date of maximum medical recovery or percentage of apportionment. This must be done by the attorney-referee, subject to review by the commission as the ultimate finder of fact.

After the date the claimant reaches maximum medical recovery, weekly compensation benefits and maximum recovery shall be reduced by that proportion which the preexisting physical handicap, disease, or lesion contributes to the results following injury.

If maximum medical recovery has occurred before the hearing and order of the attorney-referee, credit for excess payments shall be allowed in future payments. Such allowances and method of accomplishment of the same shall be determined by the attorney-referee, subject to review by the commission. However, no actual repayment of such excess shall be made to the employer or carrier.

No compensation shall be payable if the use of drugs illegally, or the use of a valid prescription medication(s) taken contrary to the prescriber’s instructions and/or contrary to label warnings, or intoxication due to the use of alcohol of the employee was the proximate cause of the injury, or if it was the willful intention of the employee to injure or kill himself or another.

Every employer to whom this chapter applies shall be liable for and shall secure the payment to his employees of the compensation payable under its provisions.

In the case of an employer who is a subcontractor, the contractor shall be liable for and shall secure the payment of such compensation to employees of the subcontractor, unless the subcontractor has secured such payment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-04; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 277; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 522, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 71-3-9.
Exclusiveness of liability.

[Effective until July 1, 2021, this section will read:]

The liability of an employer to pay compensation shall be exclusive and in place of all other liability of such employer to the employee, his legal representative, husband or wife, parents, dependents, next-of-kin, and anyone otherwise entitled to recover damages at common law or otherwise from such employer on account of such injury or death, except that if an employer fails to secure payment of compensation as required by this chapter, an injured employee, or his legal representative in case death results from the injury, may elect to claim compensation under this chapter, or to maintain an action at law for damages on account of such injury or death. In such action the defendant may not plead as a defense that the injury was caused by the negligence of a fellow servant, nor that the employee assumed the risk of his employment, nor that the injury was due to the contributory negligence of the employee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-05; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-9.
Exclusiveness of liability.

[Effective from and after July 1, 2021, this section will read:]

Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the liability of an employer to pay compensation shall be exclusive and in place of all other liability of such employer to the employee, his legal representative, husband or wife, parents, dependents, next of kin, and anyone otherwise entitled to recover damages at common law or otherwise from such employer on account of such injury or death, except that if an employer fails to secure payment of compensation as required by this chapter, an injured employee, or his legal representative in case death results from the injury, may elect to claim compensation under this chapter, or to maintain an action at law for damages on account of such injury or death. In such action the defendant may not plead as a defense that the injury was caused by the negligence of a fellow servant, nor that the employee assumed the risk of his employment, nor that the injury was due to the contributory negligence of the employee.

An employer shall not be liable under this chapter to a first responder, as defined in Section 25-15-403, if such first responder elects to receive benefits under the “Mississippi First Responders Health and Safety Act.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-05; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1990; Laws, 2019, ch. 467, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2021., eff from and after July 1, 2021.

§ 71-3-11.
Waiting period.

No compensation except medical benefits shall be allowed for the first five (5) days of the disability. In case the injury results in disability of fourteen (14) days or more, the compensation shall be allowed from the date of disability.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-06; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 6a; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 4; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-13.
Maximum and minimum recovery.

Compensation for disability or in death cases shall not exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wage for the state per week, nor shall it be less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) per week except in partial dependency cases and in partial disability cases.

Maximum recovery: The total recovery of compensation hereunder, exclusive of medical payments under Section 71-3-15, arising from the injury to an employee or the death of an employee, or any combination of such injury or death, shall not exceed the multiple of four hundred fifty (450) weeks times sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average weekly wage for the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-07; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 6b; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 4; Laws, 1958, ch. 454, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 279; Laws, 1968, ch. 559, § 4; Laws, 1972, ch. 522, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 341, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 7; Laws, 1984, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 446, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 7; Laws, 1992, ch. 577, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 71-3-15.
Medical services and supplies.

The employer shall furnish such medical, surgical, and other attendance or treatment, nurse and hospital service, medicine, crutches, artificial members, and other apparatus for such period as the nature of the injury or the process of recovery may require. The injured employee shall have the right to accept the services furnished by the employer or, in his discretion, to select one (1) competent physician of his choosing and such other specialists to whom he is referred by his chosen physician to administer medical treatment. Referrals by the chosen physician shall be limited to one (1) physician within a specialty or subspecialty area. Except in an emergency requiring immediate medical attention, any additional selection of physicians by the injured employee or further referrals must be approved by the employer, if self-insured, or the carrier prior to obtaining the services of the physician at the expense of the employer or carrier. If denied, the injured employee may apply to the commission for approval of the additional selection or referral, and if the commission determines that such request is reasonable, the employee may be authorized to obtain such treatment at the expense of the employer or carrier. Approval by the employer or carrier does not require approval by the commission. A physician to whom the employee is referred by his employer shall not constitute the employee’s selection, unless the employee, in writing, accepts the employer’s referral as his own selection. However, if the employee is treated for his alleged work-related injury or occupational disease by a physician for six (6) months or longer, or if the employee has surgery for the alleged work-related injury or occupational disease performed by a physician, then that physician shall be deemed the employee’s selection. Should the employer desire, he may have the employee examined by a physician other than of the employee’s choosing for the purpose of evaluating temporary or permanent disability or medical treatment being rendered under such reasonable terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the commission. If at any time during such period the employee unreasonably refuses to submit to medical or surgical treatment, the commission shall, by order, suspend the payment of further compensation during such time as such refusal continues, and no compensation shall be paid at any time during the period of such suspension; provided, that no claim for medical or surgical treatment shall be valid and enforceable, as against such employer, unless within twenty (20) days following the first treatment the physician or provider giving such treatment shall furnish to the employer, if self-insured, or its carrier, a preliminary report of such injury and treatment, on a form or in a format approved by the commission. Subsequent reports of such injury and treatment must be submitted at least every thirty (30) days thereafter until such time as a final report shall have been made. Reports which are required to be filed hereunder shall be furnished by the medical provider to the employer or carrier, and it shall be the responsibility of the employer or carrier receiving such reports to promptly furnish copies to the commission. The commission may, in its discretion, excuse the failure to furnish such reports within the time prescribed herein if it finds good cause to do so, and may, upon request of any party in interest, order or direct the employer or carrier to pay the reasonable value of medical services rendered to the employee.

Whenever in the opinion of the commission a physician has not correctly estimated the degree of permanent disability or the extent of the temporary disability of an injured employee, the commission shall have the power to cause such employee to be examined by a physician selected by the commission, and to obtain from such physician a report containing his estimate of such disabilities. The commission shall have the power in its discretion to charge the cost of such examination to the employer, if he is a self-insurer, or to the insurance company which is carrying the risk.

In carrying out this section, the commission shall establish an appropriate medical provider fee schedule, medical cost containment system and utilization review which incorporates one or more medical review panels to determine the reasonableness of charges and the necessity for the services, and limitations on fees to be charged by medical providers for testimony and copying or completion of records and reports and other provisions which, at the discretion of the commission, are necessary to encompass a complete medical cost containment program. The commission may contract with a private organization or organizations to establish and implement such a medical cost containment system and fee schedule with the cost for administering such a system to be paid out of the administrative expense fund as provided in this chapter. All fees and other charges for such treatment or service shall be limited to such charges as prevail in the same community for similar treatment and shall be subject to regulation by the commission. No medical bill shall be paid to any doctor until all forms and reports required by the commission have been filed. Any employee receiving treatment or service under the provisions of this chapter may not be held responsible for any charge for such treatment or service, and no doctor, hospital or other recognized medical provider shall attempt to bill, charge or otherwise collect from the employee any amount greater than or in excess of the amount paid by the employer, if self-insured, or its workers’ compensation carrier. Any dispute over the amount charged for service rendered under the provisions of this chapter, or over the amount of reimbursement for services rendered under the provisions of this chapter, shall be limited to and resolved between the provider and the employer or carrier in accordance with the fee dispute resolution procedures adopted by the commission.

The liability of an employer for medical treatment as herein provided shall not be affected by the fact that his employee was injured through the fault or negligence of a third party, not in the same employ, provided the injured employee was engaged in the scope of his employment when injured. The employer shall, however, have a cause of action against such third party to recover any amounts paid by him for such medical treatment.

An injured worker who believes that his best interest has been prejudiced by the findings of the physician designated by the employer or carrier shall have the privilege of a medical examination by a physician of his own choosing, at the expense of the carrier or employer. Such examination may be had at any time after injury and prior to the closing of the case, provided that the charge shall not exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and shall be paid by the carrier or employer where the previous medical findings are upset, but paid by the employee if previous medical findings are confirmed.

Medical and surgical treatment as provided in this section shall not be deemed to be privileged insofar as carrying out the provisions of this chapter is concerned. All findings pertaining to a second opinion medical examination, at the instance of the employer shall be reported as herein required within fourteen (14) days of the examination, except that copies thereof shall also be furnished by the employer or carrier to the employee. All findings pertaining to an independent medical examination by order of the commission shall be reported as provided in the order for such examination.

Any medical benefits paid by reason of any accident or health insurance policy or plan paid for by the employer, which were for expenses of medical treatment under this section, are, upon notice to the carrier prior to payment by it, subject to subrogation in favor of the accident or health insurance company to the extent of its payment for medical treatment under this section. Reimbursement to the accident or health insurance company by the carrier or employer, to the extent of such reimbursement, shall constitute payment by the employer or carrier of medical expenses under this section. Under no circumstances, shall any subrogation be had by any insurance company against any compensation benefits paid under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-08; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 7; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 8; Laws, 1992, ch. 577, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 582, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 522, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.